Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Chapter 21. Bribery

§ 1101.
Bribing public officers or employees.

A person shall not, directly or indirectly, corruptly, give, offer, or promise to an executive, legislative, or judicial officer, or to any employee, appointee, or designee of any executive, legislative, or judicial officer, or to a person who is a candidate or applicant for an executive, legislative, or judicial office, a gift or gratuity:

with intent to influence his or her finding, decision, report, or opinion in any matter within his or her official capacity or employment; or

for or because of any finding, decision, report, or opinion in any matter within his or her official capacity or employment.

A person who violates this section shall, if the gift or gratuity is less than $500.00 in value, be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both. A person who violates this section shall, if the gift or gratuity is $500.00 or more in value, be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23; 1987, No. 48, § 1.

§ 1102.
Public officers or employees accepting bribes.

An executive, legislative, or judicial officer, or any employee, appointee, or designee of such officer, or a person who is a candidate or applicant for an executive, legislative, or judicial office, shall not, directly or indirectly, corruptly, ask, demand, exact, solicit, accept, receive, or agree to receive a gift or gratuity, or a promise to make a gift or to do an act beneficial to himself or herself or another:

with the understanding that he or she will be influenced thereby in any finding, decision, report, or opinion in any matter within his or her official capacity or employment; or

for or because of any finding, decision, report, or opinion in any matter within his or her official capacity or employment.

A person who violates this section shall, if the gift, gratuity, or benefit is less than $500.00 in value, be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both. A person who violates this section shall, if the gift, gratuity, or benefit is $500.00 or more in value, be imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23; 1987, No. 48, § 2.

§ 1103.
Bribing triers of causes.

A person who corrupts or attempts to corrupt a master, auditor, referee, commissioner, juror, or arbitrator by giving, offering, or promising a gift or gratuity, with intent to bias the opinion or influence the decision of such person, in relation to a cause or matter pending in the court or before an inquest, or for the decision of which such officer has been chosen or appointed, shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. March 29, 1972; 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 1104.
Triers of causes accepting bribes.

A person summoned as a juror, or chosen or appointed as a master, auditor, referee, commissioner, or arbitrator, who corruptly takes anything to give his or her verdict, award, or report, or corruptly receives a gift or gratuity from a party to an action, cause, or proceedings, for the trial or decision of which such juror was summoned, or for the hearing or determination of which such master, auditor, referee, commissioner, or arbitrator was chosen or appointed, shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. March 29, 1972; 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 1105.
Public Utility Commission members or clerk not to accept pay except from State.

If a member of the Public Utility Commission or the clerk of such Commission receives pay for any service from any party other than the State, or for neglect of any service, he or she shall be imprisoned not more than six months or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both. This section shall not be construed to prevent the clerk of such Commission from receiving the usual fees for copies of records or papers in his or her office.

HISTORY:

Amended 1959, No. 329 (Adj. Sess.), § 39, eff. March 1, 1961; 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 1106.
Kickbacks; purchasing supplies.

An officer or agent of, or person employed by the State or a county, municipality, supervisory union school district, or public institution in this State, who, being authorized to procure material, supplies, or other articles by purchase or contract, or to employ service or labor, shall not corruptly, directly or indirectly, ask, demand, exact, solicit, seek, accept, receive, or agree to receive for himself or herself or for another, any benefit from the person who makes such contract, furnishes such material, supplies, or other articles, or from a person who renders service or labor under such contract, nor shall a person give or offer corruptly such benefit.

A person who violates this section shall, if the benefit has a value of less than $500.00, be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both. A person who violates this section shall, if the benefit is $500.00 or more in value, be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1987, No. 48, § 3.

§ 1107.
Kickbacks; granting licenses.

An officer or agent of, or person employed by the State or a county, municipality, supervisory union school district, or public institution in this State, who, being authorized, individually or as a member of a board or commission or other governmental entity, to grant a license, permit, or other authorization or thing of value, shall not corruptly, directly or indirectly, ask, demand, exact, solicit, seek, accept, receive, or agree to receive for himself or herself or for another, any benefit from a person who applies for a license, permit, or other authorization or thing of value, nor shall a person corruptly give or offer such benefit.

A person who violates this section shall, if the value of the benefit is less than $500.00, be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both. A person who violates this section shall, if the value of the benefit is $500.00 or more, be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 1987, No. 48, § 4.

Law Reviews —

For note, “A Crisis in Confidence: Municipal Officials Under Fire,” see 16 Vt. L. Rev. 579 (1992).

§ 1108.
Kickbacks; private corporations.

An officer or agent of, or person employed by a private corporation or business entity, who, being authorized to procure material, supplies, or other articles by purchase or contract, or to employ service or labor, shall not, directly or indirectly, solicit, ask, demand, exact, seek, accept, receive, or agree to receive, with intent that he or she will be influenced adversely to the interest of the employer or principal, any benefit from a person who makes such contract, furnishes such material, supplies, or other articles, or from a person who renders service or labor under such contract, nor shall a person give or offer such benefit.

A person who violates this section shall, if the value of the benefit is less than $500.00, be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both. A person who violates this section shall, if the value of the benefit is $500.00 or more, be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 1987, No. 48, § 5.